Utah statutes.
65A-1-6.   Witnesses -- Subpoena and oaths.

(1)  The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents in adjudicative proceedings authorized by law.

(2)  The director may administer oaths in the performance of the council's or division's official duties.

